Utah statutes.
58-40-3.   License classifications.
The division shall issue a license to each individual qualified in one of the
following classifications:
(1)  master therapeutic recreational specialist;
(2)  therapeutic recreational specialist; or
(3)  therapeutic recreational technician.
